test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kiarun_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - kiärun: # 1B d-k, r-´r
    kiärun+N+Sg+Nom: kiärun 
    kiärun+N+Sg+Gen: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Acc: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Ill: kiä'runân
    kiärun+N+Sg+Loc: kiä'runist
    kiärun+N+Sg+Com: kiä'runáin
    kiärun+N+Sg+Abe: kiärrunttáá
    kiärun+N+Ess: kiä'runin
    kiärun+N+Par: kiä'runid
    kiärun+N+Pl+Nom: kiä'runeh
    kiärun+N+Pl+Gen: kiä'runij
    kiärun+N+Pl+Acc: kiä'runijd
    kiärun+N+Pl+Ill: kiä'runáid
    kiärun+N+Pl+Loc: kiä'runijn
    kiärun+N+Pl+Com: kiä'runijguin
    kiärun+N+Pl+Abe: kiä'runijttáá
